test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-ndiko_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 
# object conjugation involves direct and indirect object

  Verb - ndiko: # Verb 'to write' - full paradigm
     ndiko+V+Inf: ndiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: nandiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: nindiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: nondiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: newandiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: neundiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: negindiko

     ndiko+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcSg1: nindikona
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcSg1: nondikona
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcSg1: neundikona
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcSg1: negindikona
#
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcSg2: nandikoni
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcSg2: nondikoni
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcSg2: newandikoni
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcSg2: negindikoni
#
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcSg3: nandikone
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcSg3: nindikone
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcSg3: nondikone
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcSg3: newandikone
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcSg3: neundikone
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcSg3: negindikone
#
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcPl1: nandikonwa
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcPl1: nindikonwa
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcPl1: nondikonwa
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcPl1: neundikonwa
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcPl1: negindikonwa
#
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcPl2: nandikou
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcPl2: nondikou
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcPl2: newandikou
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcPl2: negindikou
#
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcPl3: nandikogi
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcPl3: nindikogi
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcPl3: nondikogi
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcPl3: newandikogi
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcPl3: neundikogi
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcPl3: negindikogi


## 0%< Indicative present continuative

     ndiko+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: andiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: indiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: ondiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: wandiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: undiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: gindiko

#
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg1: indikona
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg1: ondikona
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg1: undikona
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg1: gindikona
#
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg2: andikoni
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg2: ondikoni
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg2: wandikoni
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg2: gindikoni
#
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg3: andikone
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg3: indikone
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg3: ondikone
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg3: wandikone
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg3: undikone
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg3: gindikone
#
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl1: andikonwa
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcPl1: indikonwa
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl1: ondikonwa
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl1: undikonwa
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl1: gindikonwa
#
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl2: andikou
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl2: ondikou
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl2: wandikou
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl2: gindikou
#
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl3: andikogi
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcPl3: indikogi
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl3: ondikogi
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl3: wandikogi
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl3: undikogi
     ndiko+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl3: gindikogi

##-biro-/-bro-/-bo- Indicative future

     ndiko+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg1: abrondiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg2: ibrondiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg3: obrondiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl1: wabrondiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl2: ubrondiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl3: gibrondiko

#
     ndiko+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg2+OcSg1: ibrondikona
     ndiko+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg3+OcSg1: obrondikona
     ndiko+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl2+OcSg1: ubrondikona
     ndiko+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl3+OcSg1: gibrondikona
#
     ndiko+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg1+OcSg2: abrondikoni
     ndiko+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg3+OcSg2: obrondikoni
     ndiko+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl1+OcSg2: wabrondikoni
     ndiko+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl3+OcSg2: gibrondikoni
#
     ndiko+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg1+OcSg3: abrondikone
     ndiko+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg2+OcSg3: ibrondikone
     ndiko+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg3+OcSg3: obrondikone
     ndiko+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl1+OcSg3: wabrondikone
     ndiko+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl2+OcSg3: ubrondikone
     ndiko+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl3+OcSg3: gibrondikone
#
     ndiko+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg1+OcPl1: abrondikonwa
     ndiko+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg2+OcPl1: ibrondikonwa
     ndiko+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg3+OcPl1: obrondikonwa
     ndiko+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl2+OcPl1: ubrondikonwa
     ndiko+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl3+OcPl1: gibrondikonwa
#
     ndiko+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg1+OcPl2: abrondikou
     ndiko+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg3+OcPl2: obrondikou
     ndiko+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl1+OcPl2: wabrondikou
     ndiko+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl3+OcPl2: gibrondikou
#
     ndiko+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg1+OcPl3: abrondikogi
     ndiko+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg2+OcPl3: ibrondikogi
     ndiko+V+Ind+Fut+ScSg3+OcPl3: obrondikogi
     ndiko+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl1+OcPl3: wabrondikogi
     ndiko+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl2+OcPl3: ubrondikogi
     ndiko+V+Ind+Fut+ScPl3+OcPl3: gibrondikogi

## Optative present I may write
# dipop%< 
     ndiko+V+Opt+Prs+ScSg1: dipopandiko
     ndiko+V+Opt+Prs+ScSg2: dipopindiko
     ndiko+V+Opt+Prs+ScSg3: dipopondiko
     ndiko+V+Opt+Prs+ScPl1: dipopwandiko
     ndiko+V+Opt+Prs+ScPl2: dipopundiko
     ndiko+V+Opt+Prs+ScPl3: dipopgindiko

#
     ndiko+V+Opt+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg1: dipopindikona
     ndiko+V+Opt+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg1: dipopondikona
     ndiko+V+Opt+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg1: dipopundikona
     ndiko+V+Opt+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg1: dipopgindikona
#
     ndiko+V+Opt+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg2: dipopandikoni
     ndiko+V+Opt+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg2: dipopondikoni
     ndiko+V+Opt+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg2: dipopwandikoni
     ndiko+V+Opt+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg2: dipopgindikoni
#
     ndiko+V+Opt+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg3: dipopandikone
     ndiko+V+Opt+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg3: dipopindikone
     ndiko+V+Opt+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg3: dipopondikone
     ndiko+V+Opt+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg3: dipopwandikone
     ndiko+V+Opt+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg3: dipopundikone
     ndiko+V+Opt+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg3: dipopgindikone
#
     ndiko+V+Opt+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl1: dipopandikonwa
     ndiko+V+Opt+Prs+ScSg2+OcPl1: dipopindikonwa
     ndiko+V+Opt+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl1: dipopondikonwa
     ndiko+V+Opt+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl1: dipopundikonwa
     ndiko+V+Opt+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl1: dipopgindikonwa
#
     ndiko+V+Opt+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl2: dipopandikou
     ndiko+V+Opt+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl2: dipopondikou
     ndiko+V+Opt+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl2: dipopwandikou
     ndiko+V+Opt+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl2: dipopgindikou
#
     ndiko+V+Opt+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl3: dipopandikogi
     ndiko+V+Opt+Prs+ScSg2+OcPl3: dipopindikogi
     ndiko+V+Opt+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl3: dipopondikogi
     ndiko+V+Opt+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl3: dipopwandikogi
     ndiko+V+Opt+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl3: dipopundikogi
     ndiko+V+Opt+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl3: dipopgindikogi


## CONDITION If I write

     ndiko+V+Cond+ScSg1: kandiko
     ndiko+V+Cond+ScSg2: kindiko
     ndiko+V+Cond+ScSg3: kondiko
     ndiko+V+Cond+ScPl1: kawandiko
     ndiko+V+Cond+ScPl2: kaundiko
     ndiko+V+Cond+ScPl3: kagindiko

#
     ndiko+V+Cond+ScSg2+OcSg1: kindikona
     ndiko+V+Cond+ScSg3+OcSg1: kondikona
     ndiko+V+Cond+ScPl2+OcSg1: kaundikona
     ndiko+V+Cond+ScPl3+OcSg1: kagindikona
#
     ndiko+V+Cond+ScSg1+OcSg2: kandikoni
     ndiko+V+Cond+ScSg3+OcSg2: kondikoni
     ndiko+V+Cond+ScPl1+OcSg2: kawandikoni
     ndiko+V+Cond+ScPl3+OcSg2: kagindikoni
#
     ndiko+V+Cond+ScSg1+OcSg3: kandikone
     ndiko+V+Cond+ScSg2+OcSg3: kindikone
     ndiko+V+Cond+ScSg3+OcSg3: kondikone
     ndiko+V+Cond+ScPl1+OcSg3: kawandikone
     ndiko+V+Cond+ScPl2+OcSg3: kaundikone
     ndiko+V+Cond+ScPl3+OcSg3: kagindikone
#
     ndiko+V+Cond+ScSg1+OcPl1: kandikonwa
     ndiko+V+Cond+ScSg2+OcPl1: kindikonwa
     ndiko+V+Cond+ScSg3+OcPl1: kondikonwa
     ndiko+V+Cond+ScPl2+OcPl1: kaundikonwa
     ndiko+V+Cond+ScPl3+OcPl1: kagindikonwa
#
     ndiko+V+Cond+ScSg1+OcPl2: kandikonu
     ndiko+V+Cond+ScSg3+OcPl2: kondikonu
     ndiko+V+Cond+ScPl1+OcPl2: kawandikonu
     ndiko+V+Cond+ScPl3+OcPl2: kagindikonu
#
     ndiko+V+Cond+ScSg1+OcPl3: kandikogi
     ndiko+V+Cond+ScSg2+OcPl3: kindikogi
     ndiko+V+Cond+ScSg3+OcPl3: kondikogi
     ndiko+V+Cond+ScPl1+OcPl3: kawandikogi
     ndiko+V+Cond+ScPl2+OcPl3: kaundikogi
     ndiko+V+Cond+ScPl3+OcPl3: kagindikogi

# Perfect I have written
     ndiko+V+Ind+Perf+ScSg1: asendiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+Perf+ScSg2: isendiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+Perf+ScSg3: osendiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+Perf+ScPl1: wasendiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+Perf+ScPl2: usendiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+Perf+ScPl3: gisendiko

     ndiko+V+Ind+Perf+ScSg2+OcSg1: isendikona
     ndiko+V+Ind+Perf+ScSg3+OcSg1: osendikona
     ndiko+V+Ind+Perf+ScPl2+OcSg1: usendikona
     ndiko+V+Ind+Perf+ScPl3+OcSg1: gisendikona
#
     ndiko+V+Ind+Perf+ScSg1+OcSg2: asendikoni
     ndiko+V+Ind+Perf+ScSg3+OcSg2: osendikoni
     ndiko+V+Ind+Perf+ScPl1+OcSg2: wasendikoni
     ndiko+V+Ind+Perf+ScPl3+OcSg2: gisendikoni
#
     ndiko+V+Ind+Perf+ScSg1+OcSg3: asendikone
     ndiko+V+Ind+Perf+ScSg2+OcSg3: isendikone
     ndiko+V+Ind+Perf+ScSg3+OcSg3: osendikone
     ndiko+V+Ind+Perf+ScPl1+OcSg3: wasendikone
     ndiko+V+Ind+Perf+ScPl2+OcSg3: usendikone
     ndiko+V+Ind+Perf+ScPl3+OcSg3: gisendikone
#
     ndiko+V+Ind+Perf+ScSg1+OcPl1: asendikonwa
     ndiko+V+Ind+Perf+ScSg2+OcPl1: isendikonwa
     ndiko+V+Ind+Perf+ScSg3+OcPl1: osendikonwa
     ndiko+V+Ind+Perf+ScPl2+OcPl1: usendikonwa
     ndiko+V+Ind+Perf+ScPl3+OcPl1: gisendikonwa
#
     ndiko+V+Ind+Perf+ScSg1+OcPl2: asendikou
     ndiko+V+Ind+Perf+ScSg3+OcPl2: osendikou
     ndiko+V+Ind+Perf+ScPl1+OcPl2: wasendikou
     ndiko+V+Ind+Perf+ScPl3+OcPl2: gisendikou
#
     ndiko+V+Ind+Perf+ScSg1+OcPl3: asendikogi
     ndiko+V+Ind+Perf+ScSg2+OcPl3: isendikogi
     ndiko+V+Ind+Perf+ScSg3+OcPl3: osendikogi
     ndiko+V+Ind+Perf+ScPl1+OcPl3: wasendikogi
     ndiko+V+Ind+Perf+ScPl2+OcPl3: usendikogi
     ndiko+V+Ind+Perf+ScPl3+OcPl3: gisendikogi

##
# Pluperf I had written
     ndiko+V+Ind+Pluperf+ScSg1: nasendiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+Pluperf+ScSg2: nisendiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+Pluperf+ScSg3: nosendiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+Pluperf+ScPl1: newasendiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+Pluperf+ScPl2: neusendiko
     ndiko+V+Ind+Pluperf+ScPl3: negisendiko

     ndiko+V+Ind+Pluperf+ScSg2+OcSg1: nisendikona
     ndiko+V+Ind+Pluperf+ScSg3+OcSg1: nosendikona
     ndiko+V+Ind+Pluperf+ScPl2+OcSg1: neusendikona
     ndiko+V+Ind+Pluperf+ScPl3+OcSg1: negisendikona
#
     ndiko+V+Ind+Pluperf+ScSg1+OcSg2: nasendikoni
     ndiko+V+Ind+Pluperf+ScSg3+OcSg2: nosendikoni
     ndiko+V+Ind+Pluperf+ScPl1+OcSg2: newasendikoni
     ndiko+V+Ind+Pluperf+ScPl3+OcSg2: negisendikoni
#
     ndiko+V+Ind+Pluperf+ScSg1+OcSg3: nasendikone
     ndiko+V+Ind+Pluperf+ScSg2+OcSg3: nisendikone
     ndiko+V+Ind+Pluperf+ScSg3+OcSg3: nosendikone
     ndiko+V+Ind+Pluperf+ScPl1+OcSg3: newasendikone
     ndiko+V+Ind+Pluperf+ScPl2+OcSg3: neusendikone
     ndiko+V+Ind+Pluperf+ScPl3+OcSg3: negisendikone
#
     ndiko+V+Ind+Pluperf+ScSg1+OcPl1: nasendikonwa
     ndiko+V+Ind+Pluperf+ScSg2+OcPl1: nisendikonwa
     ndiko+V+Ind+Pluperf+ScSg3+OcPl1: nosendikonwa
     ndiko+V+Ind+Pluperf+ScPl2+OcPl1: neusendikonwa
     ndiko+V+Ind+Pluperf+ScPl3+OcPl1: negisendikonwa
#
     ndiko+V+Ind+Pluperf+ScSg1+OcPl2: nasendikou
     ndiko+V+Ind+Pluperf+ScSg3+OcPl2: nosendikou
     ndiko+V+Ind+Pluperf+ScPl1+OcPl2: newasendikou
     ndiko+V+Ind+Pluperf+ScPl3+OcPl2: negisendikou
#
     ndiko+V+Ind+Pluperf+ScSg1+OcPl3: nasendikogi
     ndiko+V+Ind+Pluperf+ScSg2+OcPl3: nisendikogi
     ndiko+V+Ind+Pluperf+ScSg3+OcPl3: nosendikogi
     ndiko+V+Ind+Pluperf+ScPl1+OcPl3: newasendikogi
     ndiko+V+Ind+Pluperf+ScPl2+OcPl3: neusendikogi
     ndiko+V+Ind+Pluperf+ScPl3+OcPl3: negisendikogi

## ?? Conditional I would write
# d%<
     ndiko+V+Conditional+ScSg1: dandiko
     ndiko+V+Conditional+ScSg2: dindiko
     ndiko+V+Conditional+ScSg3: dondiko
     ndiko+V+Conditional+ScPl1: dewandiko
     ndiko+V+Conditional+ScPl2: deundiko
     ndiko+V+Conditional+ScPl3: degindiko
